Illinois, session 104th, HB3562.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Officials and Employees Ethics Act is 5amended by changing Sections 25-5, 25-20, and 25-52 as 6follows: 7    (5 ILCS 430/25-5)8    Sec. 25-5. Legislative Ethics Commission. 9    (a) The Legislative Ethics Commission is created. 10    (b) The Legislative Ethics Commission shall consist of 8 11commissioners appointed 2 each by the President and Minority 12Leader of the Senate and the Speaker and Minority Leader of the 13House of Representatives.14    The terms of the initial commissioners shall commence upon 15qualification. Each appointing authority shall designate one 16appointee who shall serve for a 2-year term running through 17June 30, 2005. Each appointing authority shall designate one 18appointee who shall serve for a 4-year term running through 19June 30, 2007. The initial appointments shall be made within 2060 days after the effective date of this Act.21    After the initial terms, commissioners shall serve for 224-year terms commencing on July 1 of the year of appointment 23and running through June 30 of the fourth following year.   HB3562- 2 -LRB104 07845 BDA 17891 b1Commissioners may be reappointed to one or more subsequent 2terms.3    A vacancy shall occur upon a commissioner's death, 4resignation, removal, disqualification, termination of 5legislative service in the house or caucus of the appointing 6authority, or other inability to act. Vacancies occurring 7other than at the end of a term shall be filled by the 8appointing authority only for the balance of the term of the 9commissioner whose office is vacant.10    Terms shall run regardless of whether the position is 11filled. 12    (c) The appointing authorities shall appoint commissioners 13who have experience holding governmental office or employment 14and may appoint commissioners who are members of the General 15Assembly, and each appointing authority shall appoint at least 16one commissioner as well as commissioners from the general 17public. A commissioner who is a member of the General Assembly 18must recuse himself or herself from participating in any 19matter relating to any investigation or proceeding in which he 20or she is the subject or is a complainant. A person is not 21eligible to serve as a commissioner if that person (i) has been 22convicted of a felony or a crime of dishonesty or moral 23turpitude, (ii) is, or was within the preceding 12 months, 24engaged in activities that require registration under the 25Lobbyist Registration Act, (iii) is a relative of the 26appointing authority, (iv) is a State officer or employee   HB3562- 3 -LRB104 07845 BDA 17891 b1other than a member of the General Assembly, or (v) is a 2candidate for statewide, federal, or judicial office.3    (c-5) If a commissioner is required to recuse himself or 4herself from participating in a matter as provided in 5subsection (c), the recusal shall create a temporary vacancy 6for the limited purpose of consideration of the matter for 7which the commissioner recused himself or herself, and the 8appointing authority for the recusing commissioner shall make 9a temporary appointment to fill the vacancy for consideration 10of the matter for which the commissioner recused himself or 11herself. 12    (d) The Legislative Ethics Commission shall have 13jurisdiction over current and former members of the General 14Assembly regarding events occurring during a member's term of 15office and current and former State employees regarding events 16occurring during any period of employment where the State 17employee's ultimate jurisdictional authority is (i) a 18legislative leader, (ii) the Senate Operations Commission, or 19(iii) the Joint Committee on Legislative Support Services. The 20Legislative Ethics Commission shall have jurisdiction over 21complainants and respondents in violation of subsection (d) of 22Section 25-90. The jurisdiction of the Commission is limited 23to matters arising under this Act.24    An officer or executive branch State employee serving on a 25legislative branch board or commission remains subject to the 26jurisdiction of the Executive Ethics Commission and is not   HB3562- 4 -LRB104 07845 BDA 17891 b1subject to the jurisdiction of the Legislative Ethics 2Commission. 3    (e) The Legislative Ethics Commission must meet, either in 4person or by other technological means, monthly or as often as 5necessary. At the first meeting of the Legislative Ethics 6Commission, the commissioners shall choose from their number a 7chairperson and other officers that they deem appropriate. The 8terms of officers shall be for 2 years commencing July 1 and 9running through June 30 of the second following year. Meetings 10shall be held at the call of the chairperson or any 3 11commissioners. Official action by the Commission shall require 12the affirmative vote of 5 commissioners, and a quorum shall 13consist of 5 commissioners. Commissioners shall receive no 14compensation but may be reimbursed for their reasonable 15expenses actually incurred in the performance of their duties.16    (f) No commissioner, other than a commissioner who is a 17member of the General Assembly, or employee of the Legislative 18Ethics Commission may during his or her term of appointment or 19employment:20        (1) become a candidate for any elective office;21        (2) hold any other elected or appointed public office 22    except for appointments on governmental advisory boards or 23    study commissions or as otherwise expressly authorized by 24    law;25        (3) be actively involved in the affairs of any 26    political party or political organization; or  HB3562- 5 -LRB104 07845 BDA 17891 b1        (4) advocate for the appointment of another person to 2    an appointed or elected office or position or actively 3    participate in any campaign for any elective office.4    (f-5) No commissioner who is a member of the General 5Assembly may be a candidate for statewide, federal, or 6judicial office. If a commissioner who is a member of the 7General Assembly files petitions to be a candidate for a 8statewide, federal, or judicial office, he or she shall be 9deemed to have resigned from his or her position as a 10commissioner on the date his or her name is certified for the 11ballot by the State Board of Elections or local election 12authority and his or her position as a commissioner shall be 13deemed vacant. Such person may not be reappointed to the 14Commission during any time he or she is a candidate for 15statewide, federal, or judicial office. 16    (g) An appointing authority may remove a commissioner only 17for cause. 18    (h) The Legislative Ethics Commission shall appoint an 19Executive Director subject to the approval of at least 3 of the 204 legislative leaders. The compensation of the Executive 21Director shall be as determined by the Commission. The 22Executive Director of the Legislative Ethics Commission may 23employ, subject to the approval of at least 3 of the 4 24legislative leaders, and determine the compensation of staff, 25as appropriations permit.26    (i) In consultation with the Legislative Inspector   HB3562- 6 -LRB104 07845 BDA 17891 b1General, the Legislative Ethics Commission may develop 2comprehensive training for members and employees under its 3jurisdiction that includes, but is not limited to, sexual 4harassment, employment discrimination, and workplace civility. 5The training may be recommended to the ultimate jurisdictional 6authorities and may be approved by the Commission to satisfy 7the sexual harassment training required under Section 5-10.5 8or be provided in addition to the annual sexual harassment 9training required under Section 5-10.5. The Commission may 10seek input from governmental agencies or private entities for 11guidance in developing such training. 12(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 101-221, eff. 8-9-19; 13101-617, eff. 12-20-19; 102-664, eff. 1-1-22.) 14    (5 ILCS 430/25-20)15    Sec. 25-20. Duties of the Legislative Inspector General. 16In addition to duties otherwise assigned by law, the 17Legislative Inspector General shall have the following duties:18        (1) To receive and investigate, without advance 19    approval of the Legislative Ethics Commission, allegations 20    of violations of this Act and other wrongful acts within 21    his or her jurisdiction based on a complaint. Except as 22    otherwise provided in paragraph (1.5), an investigation 23    may not be initiated more than one year after the alleged 24    wrongful act or the most recent act of a series of alleged 25    wrongful acts based on the same wrongful conduct except if   HB3562- 7 -LRB104 07845 BDA 17891 b1    there is reasonable cause to believe that fraudulent 2    concealment has occurred. To constitute fraudulent 3    concealment sufficient to toll this limitations period, 4    there must be an affirmative act or representation 5    calculated to prevent discovery of the fact that a 6    violation or other wrongful act has occurred. The 7    Legislative Inspector General shall have the discretion to 8    determine the appropriate means of investigation as 9    permitted by law.10        (1.5) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 11    contrary, the Legislative Inspector General, whether 12    appointed by the Legislative Ethics Commission or the 13    General Assembly, may initiate an investigation based on 14    information provided to the Office of the Legislative 15    Inspector General or the Legislative Ethics Commission 16    during the period from December 1, 2014 through November 17    3, 2017. Any investigation initiated under this paragraph 18    (1.5) must be initiated within one year after the 19    effective date of this amendatory Act of the 100th General 20    Assembly. 21        Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 22    the Legislative Inspector General, through the Attorney 23    General, shall have the authority to file a complaint 24    related to any founded violations that occurred during the 25    period December 1, 2014 through November 3, 2017 to the 26    Legislative Ethics Commission, and the Commission shall   HB3562- 8 -LRB104 07845 BDA 17891 b1    have jurisdiction to conduct administrative hearings 2    related to any pleadings filed by the Legislative 3    Inspector General, provided the complaint is filed with 4    the Commission no later than 6 months after the summary 5    report is provided to the Attorney General in accordance 6    with subsection (c) of Section 25-50. 7        (2) To request information relating to an 8    investigation from any person when the Legislative 9    Inspector General deems that information necessary in 10    conducting an investigation.11        (3) To issue subpoenas, with the advance approval of 12    the Commission, to compel the attendance of witnesses for 13    the purposes of testimony and production of documents and 14    other items for inspection and copying, and to make 15    service of those subpoenas and subpoenas issued under item 16    (7) of Section 25-15.17        (4) To submit reports as required by this Act.18        (5) To file pleadings in the name of the Legislative 19    Inspector General with the Legislative Ethics Commission, 20    through the Attorney General, as provided in this Article 21    if the Attorney General finds that reasonable cause exists 22    to believe that a violation has occurred.23        (6) To assist and coordinate the ethics officers for 24    State agencies under the jurisdiction of the Legislative 25    Inspector General and to work with those ethics officers.26        (7) To participate in or conduct, when appropriate,   HB3562- 9 -LRB104 07845 BDA 17891 b1    multi-jurisdictional investigations.2        (8) To request, as the Legislative Inspector General 3    deems appropriate, from ethics officers of State agencies 4    under his or her jurisdiction, reports or information on 5    (i) the content of a State agency's ethics training 6    program and (ii) the percentage of new officers and 7    employees who have completed ethics training.8        (9) To establish a policy that ensures the appropriate 9    handling and correct recording of all investigations of 10    allegations and to ensure that the policy is accessible 11    via the Internet in order that those seeking to report 12    those allegations are familiar with the process and that 13    the subjects of those allegations are treated fairly. 14        (10) To post information to the Legislative Inspector 15    General's website explaining to complainants and subjects 16    of an investigation the legal limitations on the 17    Legislative Inspector General's ability to provide 18    information to them and a general overview of the 19    investigation process.20(Source: P.A. 102-664, eff. 1-1-22.) 21    (5 ILCS 430/25-52)22    Sec. 25-52. Release of summary reports.23    (a) Within 60 days after the Legislative Ethics 24Commission's receipt of a summary report and response from the 25ultimate jurisdictional authority or agency head regarding a   HB3562- 10 -LRB104 07845 BDA 17891 b1potential violation of this Act or potential wrongful acts 2within the jurisdiction of the Legislative Inspector General 3that resulted in a suspension of at least 3 days or termination 4of employment, the Legislative Inspector General Ethics 5Commission shall make available to the public the report and 6response or a redacted version of the report and response. The 7Legislative Inspector General Ethics Commission may make 8available to the public any other summary report and response 9of the ultimate jurisdictional authority or agency head or a 10redacted version of the report and response without prior 11approval from the Legislative Ethics Commission. The 12Legislative Ethics Commission shall adopt no rule requiring 13the Legislative Inspector General to seek the Commission's 14advance approval before publishing summary reports authorized 15under this Article. Any commission rule in existence on, the 16effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 17Assembly requiring the Legislative Inspector General to seek 18the Commission's advance approval before commencing any 19investigation is void.20    (b) The Legislative Inspector General Ethics Commission 21shall redact information in the summary report that may reveal 22the identity of witnesses, complainants, or informants or if 23the Legislative Inspector General Commission determines it is 24appropriate to protect the identity of a person before 25publication. The Commission may also redact any information it 26believes should not be made public. Prior to publication, the   HB3562- 11 -LRB104 07845 BDA 17891 b1Legislative Inspector General Commission shall permit the 2respondents, Legislative Ethics Commission Inspector General, 3and Attorney General to review documents to be made public and 4offer suggestions for redaction or provide a response that 5shall be made public with the summary report.6    (c) The Legislative Ethics Commission may withhold 7publication of the report or response if the Legislative 8Inspector General or Attorney General certifies that 9publication will interfere with an ongoing investigation.10(Source: P.A. 96-555, eff. 8-18-09.)